Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1632
Significant hazard potential, defined.

Significant hazard potential means a hazard potential classification such that failure or misoperation of the dam would result in no probable loss of human life but could result in major economic loss, environmental damage, or disruption of lifeline facilities.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 32.